Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 1

Appointment and Removal of Trustees

35-1-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 35-1-101 — 35-1-120 (Code 1858, §§ 3648-3664 (deriv. Acts, 1831, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2; 1845-1846, ch. 194, § 2; 1853-1854, ch. 74, § 1; 1855-1856, ch. 113, §§ 11, 15); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 34, § 1; Act Jan. 14, 1868, §§ 1, 2 (published in Acts 1868-1869, p. 80); Acts 1917, ch. 137, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 3530a1-3530a3, 5414-5432; Code 1932, §§ 9573-9595; modified; Code Supp. 1950, § 9593; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 35-101 — 35-122), concerning appointment and removal of trustees, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1.

35-1-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-102 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1; 1995, ch. 351, § 1), concerning the venue, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-103 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1), concerning trustees and successor trustees, appointment by court, accounting, bonds, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-104 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1), concerning the successor trustees, their appointment by petition and multiple trustees, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-105. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-105 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1), concerning the resignation of trustees, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-106 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1; 2002, ch. 735, §§ 10-12), concerning the removal of trustees, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-107 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1), concerning the examination of accounts and deficiencies, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-108 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1), concerning the acceptance and finality of resignation or removal and divesting and vesting of title, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-109 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1), concerning bond instead of removal, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-110 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1), concerning the liability of new trustee, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

35-1-111. Real property — Documents to be recorded — Trust property.

When real estate is held as a part of the trust property, the court order accepting the resignation or ordering the removal of a trustee and appointing a successor, or an acknowledged memorandum of the order, shall be recorded in the county where any real estate is located, identifying each parcel of real estate held by the trust.

When real estate is held as part of the trust property and a trustee has resigned or been removed without order of a court, the resigning or removed trustee shall execute and record an instrument that:

Recites the resignation or removal of the trustee;

Gives the name and address of the successor trustee, if any; and

Identifies each parcel of real estate held by the trust.

A successor trustee, or a remaining trustee if there is no successor, shall execute and record the instrument described in subdivision (b)(1) if the resigning or removed trustee fails to record the required instrument within thirty (30) days after resigning or being removed.

Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1; 1992, ch. 951, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 35-1-101 — 35-1-120 (Code 1858, §§ 3648-3664 (deriv. Acts, 1831, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2; 1845-1846, ch. 194, § 2; 1853-1854, ch. 74, § 1; 1855-1856, ch. 113, §§ 11, 15); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 34, § 1; Act Jan. 14, 1868, §§ 1, 2 (published in Acts 1868-1869, p. 80); Acts 1917, ch. 137, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 3530a1-3530a3, 5414-5432; Code 1932, §§ 9573-9595; modified; Code Supp. 1950, § 9593; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 35-101 — 35-122), concerning appointment and removal of trustees, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Trusts and Trustees, §§ 43, 45.

35-1-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 35-1-101 – 35-1-110 and 35-1-112 — 35-1-114 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1; 1988, ch. 854, § 12; 1995, ch. 351, § 1; 1995, ch. 352, § 1; 2002, ch. 735, §§ 10-12), concerning the appointment and removal of trustees, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004

35-1-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 35-1-101 – 35-1-110 and 35-1-112 — 35-1-114 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1; 1988, ch. 854, § 12; 1995, ch. 351, § 1; 1995, ch. 352, § 1; 2002, ch. 735, §§ 10-12), concerning the appointment and removal of trustees, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004

Acts 2004, ch. 866, § 6, purported to amend § 35-1-113; however, that section was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537.

35-1-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 35-1-101 – 35-1-110 and 35-1-112 — 35-1-114 (Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1; 1988, ch. 854, § 12; 1995, ch. 351, § 1; 1995, ch. 352, § 1; 2002, ch. 735, §§ 10-12), concerning the appointment and removal of trustees, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004

35-1-115 — 35-1-120.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 35-1-101 — 35-1-120 (Code 1858, §§ 3648-3664 (deriv. Acts, 1831, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2; 1845-1846, ch. 194, § 2; 1853-1854, ch. 74, § 1; 1855-1856, ch. 113, §§ 11, 15); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 34, § 1; Act Jan. 14, 1868, §§ 1, 2 (published in Acts 1868-1869, p. 80); Acts 1917, ch. 137, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 3530a1-3530a3, 5414-5432; Code 1932, §§ 9573-9595; modified; Code Supp. 1950, § 9593; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 35-101 — 35-122), concerning appointment and removal of trustees, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 566, § 1.

35-1-121. Appointment of public trustee.

In addition to the other provisions for the appointment of trustees in this chapter, a public trustee may be appointed by the court pursuant to title 30, chapter 1, part 4.

Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 19.

35-1-122. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-1-122 (Acts 1997, ch. 354, § 1), concerning the change of situs of trust and venues, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.